Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 3. Title Insurance
§ 26-23-325.
Premium rate standards.

Premium rates shall not be inadequate, excessive or unfairly discriminatory.

Rates are excessive if in the aggregate they are likely to produce a long run profit that is unreasonably high in relation to the riskiness of the class of business, or if expenses are unreasonably high in relation to the services rendered.

Rates are inadequate if they are clearly insufficient, together with investment income attributable to them, to sustain projected losses and expenses, or if the continued use of such rates will have the effect of substantially lessening competition or the effect of tending to create a monopoly.

Premium rates are unfairly discriminatory if the premium charged for any classification is not reasonably related to the services performed or the risks assumed by the insurer, provided within rate classifications, premiums, to a reasonable degree, may be less in the case of smaller insurances and the excess may be charged against larger insurances without rendering the rate unfairly discriminatory.

In making or reviewing rates, consideration shall be given to past and prospective loss experience, to exposure to loss, to underwriting practice and judgment, to past and prospective expenses including amounts paid to or retained by title agents, to investment income, to a reasonable margin for profit and contingencies and to any other relevant factors both within and outside of this state.

The commissioner may promulgate rules or regulations setting forth guidelines for evaluation of rates. These regulations may include consideration of:

Costs of underwriting risks assumed by the insurer;

Amounts paid to or retained by title agents;

Operating expenses of the insurer other than underwriting and claims expenses;

Payment of claims and claim related expenses;

Investment income;

Reasonable profit;

Premium taxes; and

Any other factors the commissioner deems relevant.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 461; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-461; Laws 1971, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-28-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 150, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 188, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-23-326.
Premium rate schedules.

A title insurer shall file with the commissioner the premium rate schedules it proposes to use in this state. If the commissioner finds in his review of a filing that it does not violate W.S.

26-23-325

, he shall approve the schedule within thirty (30) days of filing. Prior to such approval, the commissioner may conduct public hearings with respect to the filing. Filings that the commissioner fails to approve or disapprove within thirty (30) days of filing are approved. Upon notice to the title insurer, the period for review of rate filing may be extended for an additional thirty (30) days. If within the waiting period or extension thereof the commissioner finds that the filing does violate W.S.

26-23-325

, he shall give written notice of disapproval of the filing to the insurer or rating organization which made the filing, specifying therein in what specific respects he finds the filing violates W.S. 26-23-325 and stating that the filing shall not become effective.

If at any time after the approval of filing, the commissioner believes that the filing does not meet the requirements of this section or is otherwise contrary to law, or if any party having an interest in the filing makes a written complaint to the commissioner setting forth specific and reasonable grounds for the complaint, or if any insurer, upon notice of disapproval by the commissioner of a filing pursuant to this section, requests, the commissioner shall hold a hearing within thirty (30) days and shall give written notice of the hearing to all parties in interest. The commissioner may confirm, modify, change or rescind any previous action, if warranted by the facts shown at the hearing.

No title insurer or title agent shall use or collect any premium after May 27, 1983, except in accordance with the premium rate schedule filed with and approved by the commissioner as required by this section. The commissioner may provide by regulation for interim use of premium rate schedules in effect prior to May 27, 1983.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 461; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-461; Laws 1971, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-28-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 150, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 188, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-23-327.
Publication of schedules of premiums and charges.

Each title insurer and title agent shall print and make available to the public schedules of its currently effective premiums and charges.

The schedules shall:

Be dated to show the date the premiums and charges became effective;

Be kept available to the public during normal business hours in each office of the title insurer or title agent in this state; and

Set forth the total premium and charge for each type of title insurance policy or service issued or provided by the title insurer or title agent either by stating the premium or charge for each type of title insurance policy in given amounts of coverage or for each service, or by stating the premium or charge rate per unit amount of coverage, or by a combination of the two.

Each title insurer and title agent shall keep a complete file of its schedules of premium and charges and of all changes and amendments to those schedules until at least five (5) years after they cease to be in effect.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-328.
Form filing.

A title insurer shall file with the commissioner any forms it proposes to use in this state, including:

Title insurance policies, including standard form endorsements;

“Preliminary reports”, “commitments”, “binders” or any other reports issued prior to the issuance of a title insurance policy.

If the commissioner finds in his review of a filing that it does not violate W.S.

26-23-329

, he shall approve the form within thirty (30) days of filing. Prior to such approval, the commissioner may conduct public hearings with respect to the filing. Filings that the commissioner has failed to approve or disapprove within thirty (30) days of filing are deemed approved. Upon notice to the title insurer, the period for review of a form filing may be extended for an additional thirty (30) days. If, within the waiting period or extension thereof, the commissioner finds that the filing does violate W.S.

26-23-329

, he shall give written notice of disapproval of the filing to the insurer or rating organization which made the filing, specifying therein in what specific respects he finds the filing violates W.S. 26-23-329 and stating that the filing shall not become effective.

A title insurer need not file reinsurance contracts and agreements.

No title insurer may issue, directly or through a title agent, any policy after May 27, 1983, unless the policy form has been approved pursuant to this section. The commissioner may provide by regulation for interim use of forms in effect prior to May 27, 1983.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 461; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-461; Laws 1971, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-28-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 150, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 188, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-23-329.
Form standards.

The commissioner shall approve any form filed under W.S.

26-23-328

only if the form:

Is written in simple language logically and clearly arranged and is understandable to a person of normal intelligence without special insurance or legal knowledge or training;

Does not contain or incorporate by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous or misleading clauses, exceptions or conditions deceptively affecting the risk purported to be assumed in the affirmative coverage of the contract;

Does not contain any misleading title, heading or other indication of its coverage;

Is not printed or otherwise reproduced in such a manner as to render any provision of the form substantially illegible; and

Is otherwise in compliance with this code [title 26].

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-23-330.
Endorsements.

Any approved policy form or endorsement providing any coverage for which no identifiable premium is assessed shall be incorporated in every policy of title insurance of the type to which the form or endorsement pertains issued by the insurer offering the approved form or endorsements. The insurer shall disclose any such additional coverage to the insured. This section does not operate to eliminate any underwriting standard or conditions relating to the approved policy forms or endorsements.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-331.
Notice of issuance of mortgagee policy.

A title insurer or title agent that issues a mortgagee’s policy of title insurance on a loan made simultaneous to the purchase of all or part of the residential property securing the loan, if no owner’s policy has been ordered, shall inform the borrower in writing that the mortgagee’s policy is to be issued, that the mortgagee’s policy does not protect the borrower and that the borrower may obtain an owner’s title insurance policy for his protection. This notice shall be provided before disbursement of the loan proceeds and before issuance of the mortgagee’s policy. The notice shall be on a form the commissioner prescribes.

If the borrower elects not to purchase an owner’s title insurance policy, the title insurer or title agent shall obtain from him a statement in writing that the notice has been received and that the borrower waives the right to purchase an owner’s title insurance policy. If the buyer refuses to provide the statement and waiver, the title insurer or title agent shall so note in the file. The statement and waiver shall be on a form the commissioner prescribes, and shall be retained by the title insurer or title agent for at least five (5) years after receipt.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-332.
Filing by rating bureaus permitted.

A title insurer may satisfy its obligation to make premium rate and form filings as required by this article by becoming a member of, or a subscriber to, a rating organization organized and licensed under this code [title 26], which organization makes such filings, and by authorizing the commissioner in writing to accept those filings on its behalf.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as:

Requiring any title insurer to become a member of, or a subscriber to, any rating organization; or

Prohibiting the filing of deviations from rating organization filings by any member or subscriber.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 461; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-461; Laws 1971, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-28-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 150, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 188, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-23-333.
Regulations.

In addition to any other powers granted under this article, the commissioner may adopt rules or regulations to protect the interests of the public including but not limited to regulations governing:

Sales practices;

Policy coverage standards;

Rebates and inducements;

Controlled business;

Unfair trade practices and fraud;

Statistical plans for data collection;

Consumer education;

Any other consumer matters;

The business of title insurance; or

Any regulations otherwise implementing or interpreting this article.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-23-334.
Enforcement.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this article, any person who violates this article in addition to or instead of suspension or revocation of the violator’s license, is subject to a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500.00) per violation. For purposes of this article each individual transaction which is not in conformance with this article is considered a violation.

This article is enforceable only by the commissioner and shall not create any private cause of action or other private legal recourse.

The commissioner may invoke the aid of the courts in enforcing this article.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

No private right of action. —

Subsection (b) precludes the court from creating a private cause of action based on the duty of title insurers to reasonably search the public record and disclose their findings. Hulse v. First Am. Title Co., 2001 WY 95, 33 P.3d 122,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2001), reh'g denied,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Nov. 20, 2001).

§ 26-23-335.
Filing of schedule of risk rates; attaching schedule of rates and charges to policy.

Each title insurer shall file with the commissioner a complete schedule of rates for or in connection with title insurance as to property located in this state. The schedule shall set forth the entire premium to be charged to the public for each type of policy included within the schedule and shall include without separate statement the portion of the charge for risk assumption and the portion which is based on work performed in the search and examination of the title. There shall be no separate filing by an agent of the title insurer.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 461; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-461; Laws 1971, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-28-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 150, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-23-336.
Mortgagee policies.

If a title insurance policy is issued insuring the title to real estate only as to a mortgagee, the insurer shall conspicuously show on the face of the policy and on any evidence thereof delivered to the mortgagor that coverage is limited to the interest of the mortgagee only.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 462; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-462; W.S. 1977, §

26-28-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cited in

N. Fork Land & Cattle, LLLP v. First Am. Title Ins.
Co., 2015 WY 150,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Nov. 24, 2015).